Colorado, session 2026A, HB1106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 13-40-109 as
follows:
13-40-109. Jurisdiction of courts - limit daily number of
forcible entry and detainer cases - definition.
(1) The district courts in their respective districts and county
courts in their respective counties have jurisdiction of OVER all cases of
forcible entry, forcible detainer, or unlawful detainer arising pursuant to
this article 40, and the person entitled to the possession of any A premises
may recover possession thereof OF THE PREMISES by action brought in any
of said courts A DISTRICT OR A COUNTY COURT in the manner provided in
this article 40.
(2) On and after January 1, 2019, In all actions AN ACTION brought
before county courts A COUNTY COURT pursuant to section 13-40-104
-2- HB26-1106

(1)(f) to (1)(i), where the allegations of the complaint are put in issue by
a verified answer and in actions AN ACTION in which the verified answer
alleges a monthly rental value of the property in excess of twenty-five
thousand dollars, the county court, upon the filing of said answer AFTER
THE ANSWER IS FILED, shall suspend all proceedings therein BEFORE THE
COUNTY COURT and certify said cause THE ACTION and transmit the papers
therein FILED IN THE COUNTY COURT to the district court of the same
county. Causes so AN ACTION certified by the A county court shall be
proceeded within the courts to which they have been so certified in all
respects as if originally begun in the court to which they have been
certified TO A DISTRICT COURT MUST PROCEED AS IF THE ACTION HAD
ORIGINALLY BEEN FILED IN THE DISTRICT COURT.
(3) On and after January 1, 2019, The jurisdiction of the county
court to enter judgment for rent, or damages, or both, and to render
judgment on a counterclaim in forcible entry and detainer shall be IS
limited to a total of twenty-five thousand dollars in favor of either party,
exclusive of costs and attorney fees.
(4) (a) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A COUNTY COURT SHALL
NOT SET FOR RETURN MORE THAN THE NUMBER OF FORCIBLE ENTRY AND
DETAINER ACTIONS ON ONE BUSINESS DAY AS FOLLOWS:
(I) FOR COUNTIES THAT HAD FEWER THAN ONE THOUSAND
FORCIBLE ENTRY AND DETAINER ACTIONS FILED IN THE PRECEDING YEAR,
A DAILY CAP OF TWENTY-FIVE ACTIONS;
(II) FOR COUNTIES THAT HAD ONE THOUSAND OR MORE BUT FEWER
THAN FIVE THOUSAND FORCIBLE ENTRY AND DETAINER ACTIONS FILED IN
THE PRECEDING YEAR, A DAILY CAP OF FORTY-FIVE ACTIONS; AND
(III) FOR COUNTIES THAT HAD FIVE THOUSAND OR MORE FORCIBLE
-3- HB26-1106

ENTRY AND DETAINER ACTIONS FILED IN THE PRECEDING YEAR, A DAILY
CAP OF SIXTY-FIVE ACTIONS.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "SET FOR RETURN" MEANS AN ACTION IN WHICH THE TENANT IS
COMMANDED TO APPEAR BEFORE THE COURT PURSUANT TO THE SUMMONS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-40-111.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-110, add
(1)(g) as follows:
13-40-110. Action - how commenced - report - definition.
(1) (g) (I) A PERSON SHALL NOT FILE A FORCIBLE ENTRY AND
DETAINER COMPLAINT PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 40 THAT INCLUDES A
MINOR TENANT AS A NAMED DEFENDANT IF A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN
IS ALSO LISTED ON THE SAME COMPLAINT.
(II) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "MINOR" MEANS A PERSON WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD
WHO HAS NOT BEEN LEGALLY EMANCIPATED.
(III) A COURT SHALL DISMISS WITHOUT PREJUDICE AN ACTION
FILED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION AND ORDER THE PARTY THAT FILED
THE ACTION TO PAY TO THE MINOR'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN ANY
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH DEFENDING THE ACTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-113, amend
(1)(a) and (2); and add (1)(c) and (4)(a.7) as follows:
13-40-113. Answer of defendant - additional and amended
pleadings.
(1) (a) The defendant shall file with the court, at or before the day
specified for the defendant's appearance in the summons, an answer in
writing. The defendant's answer must set forth the grounds on which the
-4- HB26-1106

defendant bases the defendant's claim for possession, admitting or
denying all of the material allegations of the complaint, and presenting
every defense that then exists and upon which the defendant intends to
rely, either by including the same DEFENSE in the defendant's answer or
by simultaneously filing motions setting forth each defense. IF THE
DEFENDANT'S ANSWER EXPRESSES AN INTENTION TO EXERCISE THEIR
RIGHT TO CURE PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-40-115, THEN THE COURT SHALL
NOT ENTER JUDGMENT WITHOUT A TRIAL OR A HEARING.
(c) IF THE DEFENDANT ASSERTS THAT THEY DID NOT TIMELY FILE
AN ANSWER IN WRITING FOR ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING REASONS,
THE COURT SHALL RELIEVE THE DEFENDANT FROM FINAL JUDGMENT AND
VACATE ANY JUDGMENT OR WRIT OF RESTITUTION THAT MAY HAVE BEEN
ISSUED AND PROVIDE THE DEFENDANT WITH A REASONABLE AMOUNT OF
TIME, NO LESS THAN SEVEN DAYS, TO FILE AN ANSWER TO THE COMPLAINT:
(I) A HOSPITALIZATION;
(II) A SICKNESS OR AN INJURY DOCUMENTED BY A NOTE FROM A
MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL;
(III) A REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION REQUEST MADE TO THE
COURT FOR A DISABILITY;
(IV) A LACK OF PROPER SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
13-40-112;
(V) A TRANSPORTATION ISSUE THAT REASONABLY PREVENTED
TIMELY PARTICIPATION;
(VI) A COMPLICATION RELATED TO ELECTRONIC FILING THAT WAS
REASONABLY OUTSIDE THE CONTROL OF THE DEFENDANT; AND
(VII) A COURT ISSUE THAT WAS REASONABLY OUTSIDE THE
CONTROL OF THE DEFENDANT.
-5- HB26-1106

(2) The court for good cause may permit the filing of additional
and amended pleadings if it THE FILING will not result in a delay
prejudicial to the defendant. If the defendant asserts a defense described
in section 13-40-104 (4)(a), OR IF THE DEFENDANT ASSERTS A REASON
LISTED IN SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION, the court shall permit the
filing of additional and amended pleadings.
(4) After an answer is provided to the court pursuant to this
section:
(a.7) IF A DEFENDANT IN AN ACTION FILED PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 40 REQUESTS AN EXTENSION OF A SCHEDULED TRIAL DATE DUE
TO A REASON LISTED IN SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL FIND GOOD CAUSE EXISTS TO EXTEND THE TRIAL DATE BEYOND TEN
DAYS AFTER THE ANSWER IS FILED AND SHALL MAKE ALL REASONABLE
EFFORTS TO SCHEDULE THE TRIAL DATE AT THE EARLIEST TIME
PRACTICABLE THAT WOULD ALSO ALLOW BOTH PARTIES TO PARTICIPATE.
A COURT MAY ALSO GRANT AN EXTENSION OF A SCHEDULED TRIAL DATE
FOR ANY OTHER REASON AT ITS DISCRETION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(4)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-115, amend
(4) introductory portion as follows:
13-40-115. Judgment - writ of restitution - cure period.
(4) A landlord who provides a tenant with proper notice of
nonpayment shall accept payment of the tenant's full payment of all
amounts lawfully due OWED according to the notice RENTAL AGREEMENT,
as well as any rent that remains LAWFULLY due under the rental agreement
or that remains due pursuant to a repayment plan established pursuant to
section 13-40-104 (4)(e), at any time until a judge issues a judgment for
-6- HB26-1106

possession pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section. A tenant may
pay this amount to either the landlord or to the court. Once a court has
confirmation that the full amount has been timely paid, the court shall:
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-117, amend
(3) as follows:
13-40-117. Appeals.
(3) If the appellee believes that the appellee may suffer serious
economic harm during the pendency of the appeal, the appellee may
petition the court taking the appeal to require the appellant to have an
additional undertaking to cover the anticipated harm. The court shall
order such AN ADDITIONAL undertaking only after a hearing and upon a
finding that the appellee has shown a substantial likelihood of suffering
such economic harm during the pendency of the appeal and that the
appellee will not be adequately protected under the appeals bond and the
other requirements for appeal pursuant to sections 13-40-118, 13-40-120,
and 13-40-123 PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 13-40-120 AND 13-40-123.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 13-40-118 as
follows:
13-40-118. Deposit of rent.
In all appeals from the judgment of a county court, in an action
founded upon section 13-40-104 (1)(d), the defendant, at the time of the
filing thereof, shall deposit with the court the amount of rent found due
and specified in such judgment. Unless such deposit is made, the appeal
is not perfected, and proceedings upon such judgment shall thereupon be
had accordingly. If the appeal is perfected, the court shall transmit such
deposit to the clerk of the appellate court, with the papers in such case;
and the appellant thereafter, at the time when the rents become due as
-7- HB26-1106

specified in the judgment appealed from and as often as the same become
due, shall deposit the amount thereof with the clerk of such appellate
court. In case the appellant, at any time during the pendency of such
appeal and before final judgment therein, neglects or fails to make any
deposit of rent, falling due at the time specified in the judgment appealed
from, the court in which such appeal is pending, upon such fact being
made to appear and upon motion of the appellee, shall affirm the
judgment appealed from with costs; and proceedings thereupon shall be
had as in like cases determined upon the merits.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 13-40-120 as
follows:
13-40-120. Appellate review.
Appellate review of the judgment of the district courts of this state
in proceedings under this article ARTICLE 40 is allowed as provided by
law and the Colorado appellate rules. In cases of appeal from judgments
founded upon causes of action embraced in section 13-40-104 (1)(d), the
deposit of rent money during pendency of appeal shall be made, or
judgment of affirmance shall be entered, in the manner provided in
section 13-40-118.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-122, amend
(1)(a) and (1)(b); and add (1)(d) and (1)(e) as follows:
13-40-122. Writ of restitution after judgment - definitions.
(1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(a.5) of this section,
a court shall not issue a writ of restitution upon any judgment entered in
any action pursuant to this article 40 until forty-eight hours after the time
of the entry of the judgment. If the writ of restitution concerns a
residential tenant who receives supplemental security income, social
-8- HB26-1106

security disability insurance under Title II of the federal "Social Security
Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 401 et seq., as amended, or cash assistance through
the Colorado works program created in part 7 of article 2 of title 26, The
writ must specify that the writ is not executable for thirty days after entry
of judgment pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section; except in the
case
(I) in which a court has ordered a judgment for possession for a
substantial violation pursuant to section 13-40-107.5. or
(II) Of a landlord with five or fewer single-family rental homes
and no more than five total rental units including any single-family
homes.
(b) A writ of restitution must be executed by the officer having the
same only in the daytime and between sunrise and sunset, and the officer
shall not execute a writ of restitution concerning a residential tenancy
until at least ten days after entry of the judgment; except that the officer
shall not execute a writ of restitution concerning a residential tenancy
until at least thirty days after entry of judgment; if the residential tenant
receives supplemental security income, social security disability insurance
under Title II of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 401 et
seq., as amended, or cash assistance through the Colorado works program
created in part 7 of article 2 of title 26, as specified in the writ; except in
the case
(I) in which a court has ordered a judgment for possession for a
substantial violation pursuant to section 13-40-107.5. or
(II) Of a landlord with five or fewer single-family rental homes
and no more than five total rental units including any single-family
homes.
-9- HB26-1106

(d) AN OFFICER SHALL NOT EXECUTE A WRIT OF RESTITUTION
DURING INCLEMENT WEATHER.
(e) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "INCLEMENT WEATHER" MEANS THE FORECASTED DAILY HIGH
IS BELOW THIRTY-TWO DEGREES FAHRENHEIT OR ABOVE NINETY DEGREES
FAHRENHEIT OR SUBSTANTIAL RAIN OR SNOW IS ACCUMULATING OR
PROJECTED.
SECTION 9. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-10- HB26-1106